Massachusetts, session 194th, H1357.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 6 of chapter 6D of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking
clause (b) and replacing it with following:-
(b) Each acute hospital, ambulatory surgical center, non-hospital provider organization,
pharmaceutical manufacturing company, pharmacy benefit manager and surcharge payor shall
pay to the commonwealth an amount for the estimated expenses of the commission.
and is further amended in said section and chapter by adding the following clause:-
(g) The assessed amount for surcharge payors shall be not less than 30 per cent nor more
than 40 per cent of the amount appropriated by the general court for the expenses of the
commission minus amounts collected from: (i) filing fees; (ii) fees and charges generated by the
commission; and (iii) federal matching revenues received for these expenses or received
retroactively for expenses of predecessor agencies. Surcharge payors amount of the estimated
expense of the commission may be assessed and transferred in accordance with sections 64 and
of 2

66 of chapter 118E; provided further that such amount shall not be less than the health policy
commission revenue amount.
SECTION 2. Section 7 of chapter 12C of the General Laws is hereby amended by
striking clause (b) and replacing it with the following:-
(b) Each acute hospital, ambulatory surgical center, non-hospital provider organization,
pharmaceutical manufacturing company, pharmacy benefit manager and surcharge payor shall
pay to the commonwealth an amount for the estimated expenses of the center and for the other
purposes described in this chapter which shall include any transfer made to the Community
Hospital Reinvestment Trust Fund established in section 2TTTT of chapter 29.
and is further amended in said section and chapter adding the following clause:-
(g) The assessed amount for surcharge payors shall be not less than 30 per cent nor more
than 40 per cent of the amount appropriated by the general court for the expenses of the center
and for the other purposes described in this chapter which shall include any transfer made to the
Community Hospital Reinvestment Trust Fund established in section 2TTTT of chapter 29
minus amounts collected from: (i) filing fees; (ii) fees and charges generated by the center’s
publication or dissemination of reports and information; and (iii) federal matching revenues
received for these expenses or received retroactively for expenses of predecessor agencies.
Surcharge payors amount of the estimated expense of the commission may be assessed and
transferred in accordance with sections 64 and 66 of chapter 118E; provided further that such
amount shall not be less than the center for health information and analysis revenue amount.
of 2